Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 19.290.080 and 2024 c 301 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to criminal penalties shall be a civil penalty punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.(2) Within two years of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that results in a civil penalty under this section, each subsequent violation shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000.(3)(a) A scrap metal business that engages in a pledge for, the purchase of, or the trade of stolen copper that was used in telecommunication cable, the theft of which can result in disruption to emergency telecommunication services, is liable for a civil penalty of:(i) Not more than $10,000 for a first violation; and(ii) Not more than $20,000 for a second violation.(b) A third violation of this subsection must result in loss of licensure.--- END ---